Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2310
Costs of storage; how assessed.

(1) Costs of storage for which payment may be required shall be assessed in the following manner:

(a) When a former tenant claims property pursuant to section 69-2307, he or she may be required to pay the reasonable costs of storage for all the personal property remaining on the premises at the termination of the tenancy; and

(b) When an owner other than the former tenant claims property pursuant to section 69-2307, he or she may be required to pay the reasonable costs of storage for only the property in which he or she claims an interest.

(2) In determining the costs to be assessed under subsection (1) of this section, the landlord may not charge more than one person for the same costs.

Laws 1991, LB 36, § 10.